Florida, session 2026, HB603.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (21) of section 112.312, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
112.312 Definitions.—As used in this part and for purposes
of the provisions of s. 8, Art. II of the State Constitution,
unless the context otherwise requires:
(21) "Relative," unless otherwise specified in this part,
means an individual who is related to a public officer or
employee as father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister,
uncle, aunt, first cousin, nephew, niece, husband, wife, father-
in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-
law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson,
stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, half
sister, grandparent, great grandparent, grandchild, great
grandchild, step grandparent, step great grandparent, step
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb603-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 603 2026
grandchild, or step great grandchild; an individual who, while
the public officer or employee was a minor, was his or her
legally recognized foster parent in the jurisdiction where the
relationship occurred or an individual who is a current or
former legally recognized foster child of the public officer or
employee in the jurisdiction where the relationship occurs or
occurred; a, person who is engaged to be married to the public
officer or employee or who otherwise holds himself or herself
out as or is generally known as the person whom the public
officer or employee intends to marry or with whom the public
officer or employee intends to form a household;, or any other
natural person having the same legal residence as the public
officer or employee.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 112.312, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, section 1001.421, Florida Statutes, is
reenacted to read:
1001.421 Gifts.—Notwithstanding any other provision of law
to the contrary, district school board members and their
relatives, as defined in s. 112.312(21), may not directly or
indirectly solicit any gift, or directly or indirectly accept
any gift in excess of $50, from any person, vendor, potential
vendor, or other entity doing business with the school district.
The term "gift" has the same meaning as in s. 112.312(12).
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb603-00